North Dakota statutes. TITLE 15.1 Elementary and Secondary Education
CHAPTER 15.1-37 Early Childhood Education Program

15.1-37-01.
Early childhood education program — Approval. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 2005, ch. 178, § 1; 2011, ch. 147, § 31; 2015, ch. 156, § 1, effective August 1, 2015; repealed by 2021, ch. 358, § 11, effective July 1, 2021.

15.1-37-02.
North Dakota early childhood education council — Membership — Terms. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 2009, ch. 175, § 43; 2011, ch. 147, § 32; repealed by 2021, ch. 358, § 11, effective July 1, 2021.

15.1-37-03.
Council — Duties. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 2009, ch. 175, § 44; 2011, ch. 147, § 33; repealed by 2021, ch. 358, § 11, effective July 1, 2021.

15.1-37-04.
Council members — Reimbursement for expenses. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 2009, ch. 175, § 45; repealed by 2021, ch. 358, § 11, effective July 1, 2021.

15.1-37-05.
Early childhood education providers — Coalition — Eligibility. [Suspended through June 30, 2025 — See note]

The superintendent of a school district shall invite all public and private providers of early childhood education services within the district to meet to:

Initiate the identification of all available options for cost-effectively maximizing the provision of early childhood education services within the district;

Address the coordinated utilization of facilities, personnel, and transportation, for the provision of early childhood education services within the district; and

Form a coalition of early childhood education service providers; and

Provide for the selection of a coalition governing board.

The board of the school district in which the coalition of service providers is located shall provide advice and guidance to the coalition in all matters pertaining to this section through section 15.1-37-08.

Any early childhood service provider who agrees to participate in the coalition or on its governing board may submit an application to the department of commerce for a grant under this section, provided the governing board certifies to the department that the provider:

Is a participating member in the coalition or on the governing board.

Operates an early childhood education program that:

Is approved in accordance with section 50-11.1-21; and

Incorporates within its curriculum at least ten hours of research-based parental involvement.

Has documented the provider’s willingness to admit children of all learning abilities into the early childhood education program.

History.

S.L. 2015, ch. 156, § 2, effective July 1, 2015; 2021, ch. 358, § 2, effective July 1, 2021; § 2; Suspended by 2021, ch. 368, § 5, eff August 1, 2021.

Effective Date.

This section becomes effective July 1, 2015.

Note.

Pursuant to 2021 S.L. ch. 365, §§ 5 and 6, section 15.1-37-05 is suspended from August 1, 2021 through June 30, 2025.

15.1-37-06.
Receipt and distribution of grants — Notification. [Suspended through June 30, 2025 — See note]

The department of commerce shall receive applications for and distribute grants under this section to eligible members, including governing board members, of a consortium formed in accordance with section 15.1-37-05, in the amount of two thousand dollars for each child enrolled in a program of early childhood education, if the child is eligible for free lunches under the Richard B. Russell National School Lunch Act [42 U.S.C. 1751, et seq.], and one thousand dollars for each child enrolled in a program of early childhood education, if the child is eligible for reduced lunches under the Richard B. Russell National School Lunch Act [42 U.S.C. 1751, et seq.], provided:

The child is a resident of this state;

The child has reached four years of age before August first in the year of enrollment; and

The program has a duration of at least four hundred hours over a period of at least thirty-two consecutive weeks.

A child enrolled in a federally funded head start program may not be counted for the purpose of determining grant eligibility under this section.

Once each calendar quarter, at the time and in the manner required by the department of commerce, any provider receiving a grant under this section shall forward to the parent of each child receiving services a notice indicating the total amount of the grant that was awarded to the provider for the quarter, the pro rata amount attributable to the parent’s child, and the source of the grant. The department of commerce shall standardize the notification required by this subdivision.

If a provider fails to meet the notification requirements of this subsection, the department of commerce shall reduce the amount of the provider’s next grant payment by fifty percent. If a provider fails to meet the notification requirements of this section a second time, the department of commerce shall determine that the provider is ineligible to participate in the grant program for a period of one year.

History.

S.L. 2015, ch. 156, § 3, effective July 1, 2015; § 5; Suspended by 2021, ch. 368, § 5, eff August 1, 2021; 2017, ch. 151, § 1, effective August 1, 2017.

Effective Date.

This section becomes effective July 1, 2016.

Note.

Pursuant to 2021 S.L. ch. 365, §§ 5 and 6, section 15.1-37-06 is suspended from August 1, 2021 through June 30, 2025.

15.1-37-07.
Acceptance of children into program — Requirements — Limitations. [Repealed]

History.

S.L. 2015, ch. 156, § 4, effective July 1, 2016; repealed by 2021, ch. 358, § 11, effective July 1, 2021.

15.1-37-08.
Data collection — Requirements. [Suspended through June 30, 2025 — See note]

The superintendent of public instruction, with the advice and consent of the department of commerce, shall implement a uniform system for the accounting, budgeting, and reporting of data by any early childhood education provider to whom or to which grants are distributed in accordance with section 15.1-37-06. Grants may be withheld or forfeited, in whole or in part, if information required in accordance with this section is not submitted at the time or in the manner requested by the superintendent.

History.

S.L. 2015, ch. 156, § 5, effective July 1, 2016; § 5; Suspended by 2021, ch. 368, § 5, eff August 1, 2021.

Effective Date.

This section becomes effective July 1, 2016.

Note.

Pursuant to 2021 S.L. ch. 365, §§ 5 and 6,
section 15.1-37-08 is suspended from August 1, 2021 through June 30, 2025.